Hawaii statutes.
§354D-11 Provisions for qualified,
able-bodied inmates; employment. (a) The director or a designated
representative shall make all qualified, able-bodied inmate work assignments
with the correctional industries program and establish the rate of compensation
for the assignments. A portion of the compensation shall be paid to the
qualified, able-bodied inmate in relation to the number of hours worked, type
of work assignment, and quality of work performed. Payment rates shall be
established on an annual basis after review by the advisory committee.

(b) The department shall recommend a possible
reduction in the minimum term to the Hawaii paroling authority for any offender
satisfactorily participating in the correctional industries program for a
minimum of one year or for any period the equivalent of one-half of the balance
of the term remaining to the tentative parole date. The possible reduction in
the minimum term shall be determined by the performance and evaluation of the
offender by the correctional industries program as recommended to the director
or the director's designee.

(c) The department is authorized to adopt
rules governing the employment, conduct, and management of qualified,
able-bodied inmates while assigned to programs. All rules pertaining to the
payment, employment, conduct, and management of qualified, able-bodied inmates
shall be published and posted for inmates. [L 1990, c 341, pt of §1; am L 1991,
c 256, §5]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next